Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.100

Governance training program.

(1) Except as provided otherwise by this subsection (1), beginning with the 2022 calendar year, each member of a board of directors shall complete a governance training program once per term of elected office. If the director is appointed or elected to a first term of office, the director must complete a governance training required by this subsection (1) within two years of appointment or certification of the election in which they were elected.

(2) Governance training programs completed by directors in accordance with subsection (1) of this section must be aligned with the cultural competency, diversity, equity, and inclusion standards for school director governance developed under RCW 28A.345.115 and provided by the Washington state school directors' association.

(3) For purposes of this section, "cultural competency," "diversity," "equity," and "inclusion" have the same meaning as in RCW 28A.415.443.

[ 2021 c 197 s 7.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 197: See note following RCW 28A.415.443.